North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113A. Pollution Control and Environment.
Article 7. Coastal Area Management.
§ 113A-123.
Judicial review.

Any person directly affected by any final decision or order of the Commission under this Part may appeal such decision or order to the superior court of the county where the land or any part thereof is located, pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. Pending final disposition of any appeal, no action shall be taken which would be unlawful in the absence of a permit issued under this Part.

Any person having a recorded interest or interest by operation of law in or registered claim to land within an area of environmental concern affected by any final decision or order of the Commission under this Part may, within 90 days after receiving notice thereof, petition the superior court to determine whether the petitioner is the owner of the land in question, or an interest, therein, and in case he is adjudged the owner of the subject land, or an interest therein, the court shall determine whether such order so restricts the use of his property as to deprive him of the practical uses thereof, being not otherwise authorized by law, and is therefore an unreasonable exercise of the police power because the order constitutes the equivalent of taking without compensation. The burden of proof shall be on petitioner as to ownership and the burden of proof shall be on the Commission to prove that the order is not an unreasonable exercise of the police power, as aforesaid. Either party shall be entitled to a jury trial on all issues of fact, and the court shall enter a judgment in accordance with the issues, as to whether the Commission order shall apply to the land of the petitioner. The Secretary shall cause a copy of such finding to be recorded forthwith in the register of deeds office in the county where the land is located. The method provided in this subsection for the determination of the issue of whether such order constitutes a taking without compensation shall be exclusive and such issue shall not be determined in any other proceeding. Any action authorized by this subsection shall be calendared for trial at the next civil session of superior court after the summons and complaint have been served for 30 days, regardless of whether issues were joined more than 10 days before the session. It is the duty of the presiding judge to expedite the trial of these actions and to give them a preemptory setting over all others, civil or criminal. From any decision of the superior court either party may appeal to the court of appeals as a matter of right.

After a finding has been entered that such order shall not apply to certain land as provided in the preceding subsection, the Department of Administration, upon the request of the Commission and upon finding that sufficient funds are available therefor, and with the consent of the Governor and Council of State may take the fee or any lesser interest in such land in the name of the State by eminent domain under the provisions of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes and hold the same for the purposes set forth in this Article.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; c. 1331, s. 3; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1987, c. 827, s. 1; 1989, c. 727, s. 134.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Coastal Management Law in North Carolina: 1974-1994,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1413 (1994).

§ 113A-124.
Additional powers and duties.

The Secretary shall have the following additional powers and duties under this Article:

To conduct or cause to be conducted, investigations of proposed developments in areas of environmental concern in order to obtain sufficient evidence to enable a balanced judgment to be rendered concerning the issuance of permits to build such developments.

To cooperate with the Secretary of the Department of Administration in drafting State guidelines for the coastal area.

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-158, s. 2(b), effective July 1, 2021, and applicable to permit applications received on or after that date.

To propose rules to implement this Article for consideration by the Commission.

To delegate such of his powers as he may deem appropriate to one or more qualified employees of the Department or to any local government, provided that the provisions of any such delegation of power shall be set forth in departmental rules.

To delegate the power to conduct a hearing, on his behalf, to any member of the Commission or to any qualified employee of the Department. Any person to whom a delegation of power is made to conduct a hearing shall report his recommendations with the record of the hearing to the Secretary for decision or action.

In order to carry out the provisions of this Article the Secretaries of Administration and of Environmental Quality may employ such clerical, technical and professional personnel, and consultants with such qualifications as the Commission may prescribe, in accordance with the State personnel rules and budgetary laws, and are hereby authorized to pay such personnel from any funds made available to them through grants, appropriations, or any other sources. In addition, the said secretaries may contract with any local governmental unit or lead regional organization to carry out the planning provisions of this Article.

The Commission shall have the following additional powers and duties under this Article:

To recommend to the Secretary the acceptance of donations, gifts, grants, contributions and appropriations from any public or private source to use in carrying out the provisions of this Article.

To recommend to the Secretary of Administration the acquisition by purchase, gift, condemnation, or otherwise, lands or any interest in any lands within the coastal area.

To hold such public hearings as the Commission deems appropriate.

To delegate the power to conduct a hearing, on behalf of the Commission, to any member of the Commission or to any qualified employee of the Department. Any person to whom a delegation of power is made to conduct a hearing shall report his recommendations with the evidence and the record of the hearing to the Commission for decision or action.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 141.

To delegate the power to determine whether a contested case hearing is appropriate in accordance with G.S. 113A-121.1(b).

To delegate the power to grant or deny requests for declaratory rulings under

G.S. 150B-4

in accordance with standards adopted by the Commission.

To adopt rules to implement this Article.

To delegate the power to approve land-use plans in accordance with G.S. 113A-110(f) to any qualified employee of the Department.

The Attorney General shall act as attorney for the Commission and shall initiate actions in the name of, and at the request of, the Commission, and shall represent the Commission in the hearing of any appeal from or other review of any order of the Commission.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1987, c. 827, ss. 125, 141; 1989, c. 727, s. 135; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 839, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(v); 2017-209, s. 5(a); 2021-158, s. 2(b).

§ 113A-125.
Transitional provisions.

Existing regulatory permits shall continue to be administered within the coastal area by the agencies presently responsible for their administration until a date (not later than 44 months after July 1, 1974), to be designated by the Secretary of Natural and Economic Resources as the permit changeover date. Said designation shall be effective from and after its filing with the Secretary of State.

From and after the “permit changeover date,” all existing regulatory permits within the coastal area shall be administered in coordination and consultation with (but not subject to the veto of) the Commission. No such existing permit within the coastal area shall be issued, modified, renewed or terminated except after consultation with the Commission. The provisions of this subsection concerning consultation and coordination shall not be interpreted to authorize or require the extension of any deadline established by this Article or any other law for completion of any permit, licensing, certification or other regulatory proceedings.

Within the meaning of this section, “existing regulatory permits” include dredge and fill permits issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-229

; sand dune permits issued pursuant to G.S. 104B-4; air pollution control and water pollution control permits, special orders or certificates issued pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.1

and 143-215.2, or any other permits, licenses, authorizations, approvals or certificates issued by the Board of Water and Air Resources pursuant to Chapter 143; capacity use area permits issued pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.15

; final approval of dams pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.30

; floodway permits issued pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.54

; water diversion authorizations issued pursuant to G.S. 143-354(c); oil refinery permits issued pursuant to

G.S. 143-215.99

; mining operating permits issued pursuant to

G.S. 74-51

; permissions for construction of wells issued pursuant to

G.S. 87-88

; and rules concerning pesticide application within the coastal area issued pursuant to

G.S. 143-458

; approvals by the Department of Health and Human Services of plans for water supply, drainage or sewerage, pursuant to G.S. 130-161.1 and 130-161.2; standards and approvals for solid waste disposal sites and facilities, adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Chapter 130, Article 13B; permits relating to sanitation of shellfish, crustacea or scallops issued pursuant to Chapter 130, Articles 14A or 14B; permits, approvals, authorizations and rules issued by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to Articles 23 or 24 of Chapter 130 with reference to mosquito control programs or districts; any permits, licenses, authorizations, rules, approvals or certificates issued by the Department of Health and Human Services relating to septic tanks or water wells; oil or gas well rules and orders issued for the protection of environmental values or resources pursuant to

G.S. 113-391

; a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued by the State Utilities Commission pursuant to Chapter 62 for any public utility plant or system, other than a carrier of persons or property; permits, licenses, leases, options, authorization or approvals relating to the use of State forestlands, State parks or other state-owned land issued by the State Department of Administration, the State Department of Natural and Economic Resources or any other State department, agency or institution; any approvals of erosion and sedimentation control plans that may be issued by the North Carolina Sedimentation Control Commission pursuant to

G.S. 113A-60

or 113A-61; and any permits, licenses, authorizations, rules, approvals or certificates issued by any State agency pursuant to any environmental protection legislation not specified in this subsection that may be enacted prior to the permit changeover date.

The Commission shall conduct continuing studies addressed to developing a better coordinated and more unified system of environmental and land-use permits in the coastal area, and shall report its recommendations thereon from time to time to the General Assembly.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, ss. 4, 5; 1979, c. 299; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1987, c. 827, ss. 125, 142; 1997-443, s. 11A.122; 2002-165, s. 2.16.

§ 113A-126.
Injunctive relief and penalties.

Upon violation of any of the provisions of this Article or of any rule or order adopted under the authority of this Article the Secretary may, either before or after the institution of proceedings for the collection of any penalty imposed by this Article for such violation, institute a civil action in the General Court of Justice in the name of the State upon the relation of the Secretary for injunctive relief to restrain the violation and for a preliminary and permanent mandatory injunction to restore the resources consistent with this Article and rules of the Commission. If the court finds that a violation is threatened or has occurred, the court shall, at a minimum, order the relief necessary to prevent the threatened violation or to abate the violation consistent with this Article and rules of the Commission. Neither the institution of the action nor any of the proceedings thereon shall relieve any party to such proceedings from any penalty prescribed by this Article for any violation of same.

Upon violation of any of the provisions of this Article relating to permits for minor developments issued by a local government, or of any rule or order adopted under the authority of this Article relating to such permits, the designated local official may, either before or after the institution of proceedings for the collection of any penalty imposed by this Article for such violation, institute a civil action in the General Court of Justice in the name of the affected local government upon the relation of the designated local official for injunctive relief to restrain the violation and for a preliminary and permanent mandatory injunction to restore the resources consistent with this Article and rules of the Commission. If the court finds that a violation is threatened or has occurred, the court shall, at a minimum, order the relief necessary to prevent the threatened violation or to abate the violation consistent with this Article and rules of the Commission. Neither the institution of the action nor any of the proceedings thereon shall relieve any party to such proceedings from any penalty prescribed by this Article for any violation of same.

Any person who shall be adjudged to have knowingly or willfully violated any provision of this Article, or any rule or order adopted pursuant to this Article, shall be guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. In addition, if any person continues to violate or further violates, any such provision, rule or order after written notice from the Secretary or (in the case of a permit for a minor development issued by a local government) written notice from the designated local official, the court may determine that each day during which the violation continues or is repeated constitutes a separate violation subject to the foregoing penalties.

A civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for a minor development violation and ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for a major development violation may be assessed by the Commission against any person who:

Is required but fails to apply for or to secure a permit required by

G.S. 113A-118

, or who violates or fails to act in accordance with the terms, conditions, or requirements of such permit.

Fails to file, submit, or make available, as the case may be, any documents, data or reports required by the Commission pursuant to this Article.

Refuses access to the Commission or its duly designated representative, who has sufficiently identified himself by displaying official credentials, to any premises, not including any occupied dwelling house or curtilage, for the purpose of conducting any investigations provided for in this Article.

Violates a rule of the Commission implementing this Article.

For each willful action or failure to act for which a penalty may be assessed under this subsection, the Commission may consider each day the action or inaction continues after notice is given of the violation as a separate violation; a separate penalty may be assessed for each such separate violation.

The Commission shall notify a person who is assessed a penalty or investigative costs by registered or certified mail. The notice shall state the reasons for the penalty. A person may contest the assessment of a penalty or investigative costs by filing a petition for a contested case under

G.S. 150B-23

within 20 days after receiving the notice of assessment. If a person fails to pay any civil penalty or investigative cost assessed under this subsection, the Commission shall refer the matter to the Attorney General for collection. An action to collect a penalty must be filed within three years after the date the final decision was served on the violator.

In determining the amount of the civil penalty, the Commission shall consider the following factors:

The degree and extent of harm, including, but not limited to, harm to the natural resources of the State, to the public health, or to private property resulting from the violation;

The duration and gravity of the violation;

The effect on water quality, coastal resources, or public trust uses;

The cost of rectifying the damage;

The amount of money saved by noncompliance;

Whether the violation was committed willfully or intentionally;

The prior record of the violator in complying or failing to comply with programs over which the Commission has regulatory authority; and

The cost to the State of the enforcement procedures.

(4a)

The Commission may also assess a person who is assessed a civil penalty under this subsection the reasonable costs of any investigation, inspection, or monitoring that results in the assessment of the civil penalty. For a minor development violation, the amount of an assessment of investigative costs shall not exceed one-half of the amount of the civil penalty assessed or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is less. For a major development violation, the amount of an assessment of investigative costs shall not exceed one-half of the amount of the civil penalty assessed or two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), whichever is less.

The clear proceeds of penalties assessed pursuant to this subsection shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund in accordance with

G.S. 115C-457.2

.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1977, c. 771, s. 4; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1983, c. 485, ss. 1-3; c. 518, s. 6; 1987, c. 827, ss. 11, 143; 1991, c. 725, s. 6; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 839, s. 3; c. 890, s. 8; 1993, c. 539, s. 874; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1998-215, s. 53(a); 2006-229, s. 1; 2011-398, s. 38.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-229, s. 1, effective December 1, 2006, and applicable to violations and offenses committed on or after that date, in the introductory paragraph of subdivision (d)(1), substituted “one thousand dollars ($1,000)” for “two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00)” near the beginning, and substituted “ten thousand dollars ($10,000)” for “two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500)” near the middle; in subdivision (d)(3), deleted the former first sentence which read:
“The Commission may assess the penalties provided for in this subsection.” and inserted “or investigative costs” in the the middle of the first sentence, in the second sentence, inserted “the assessment of,” and inserted “or investigative costs,” and in the third sentence, substituted “any civil penalty or investigative cost assessed under this subsection” for “a penalty”; rewrote subdivision (d)(4); and added subdivision (d)(4a).

Session Laws 2011-398, s. 38, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to contested cases commenced on or after that date, deleted “agency” preceding “decision” in the last sentence of subdivision (d)(3).

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “The Forty-Two Hundred Dollar Question: ‘May State Agencies Have Discretion in Setting Civil Penalties Under the North Carolina Constitution?’,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 1035 (1990).

For article, “Coastal Management Law in North Carolina: 1974-1994,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1413 (1994).

§ 113A-127.
Coordination with the federal government.

All State agencies shall keep informed of federal and interstate agency plans, activities, and procedures within their area of expertise that affect the coastal area. Where federal or interstate agency plans, activities or procedures conflict with State policies, all reasonable steps shall be taken by the State to preserve the integrity of its policies.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1.

§ 113A-128.
Protection of landowners’ rights.

Nothing in this Article authorizes any governmental agency to adopt a rule or issue any order that constitutes a taking of property in violation of the Constitution of this State or of the United States.

History.

1973, c. 1284, s. 1; 1975, c. 452, s. 5; 1981, c. 932, s. 2.1; 1987, c. 827, s. 144.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The Pearl in the Oyster: The Public Trust Doctrine in North Carolina,” see 12 Campbell L. Rev. 23 (1989).

§ 113A-129.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 5. Coastal Reserves.

§ 113A-129.1.
Legislative findings and purposes.

Findings. — It is hereby determined and declared as a matter of legislative finding that the coastal area of North Carolina contains a number of important undeveloped natural areas. These areas are vital to continued fishery and wildlife protection, water quality maintenance and improvement, preservation of unique and important coastal natural areas, aesthetic enjoyment, and public trust rights such as hunting, fishing, navigation, and recreation. Such land and water areas are necessary for the preservation of estuarine areas of the State, constitute important research facilities, and provide public access to waters of the State.

Purposes. — Important public purposes will be served by the preservation of certain of these areas in an undeveloped state. Such areas would thereafter be available for research, education, and other consistent public uses. These areas would also continue to contribute perpetually to the natural productivity and biological, economic, and aesthetic values of North Carolina’s coastal area.

History.

1989, c. 344, s. 1.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Coastal Management Law in North Carolina: 1974-1994,” see 72 N.C.L. Rev. 1413 (1994).

For article, “The Evolution of Modern North Carolina Environmental and Conservation Policy Legislation,” see 29 Campbell L. Rev. 535 (2007).

§ 113A-129.2.
Coastal Reserve Program.

There is hereby created a North Carolina Coastal Reserve System for the purpose of acquiring, improving, and maintaining undeveloped coastal land and water areas in a natural state.

This system shall be established and administered by the Department of Environmental Quality. In so doing the Department shall consult with and seek the ongoing advice of the Coastal Resources Commission. The Department may by rule define the areas to be included in this system and set standards for its use.

This system shall be established within the coastal area as defined by G.S. 113A-103(2).

All acquisitions or dispositions of property for lands within this system shall be in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes.

All lands and waters within the system shall be used primarily for research and education. Other public uses, such as hunting, fishing, navigation, and recreation, shall be allowed to the extent consistent with these primary uses. Improvements and alterations to the lands shall be limited to those consistent with these uses.

History.

1989, c. 344, s. 1; c. 727, s. 218(58); 1997-443, s. 11A.119(a); 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2015-241, s. 14.30(u), effective July 1, 2015, substituted “Department of Environmental Quality” for “Department of Environment and Natural Resources” in subsection (b).

§ 113A-129.3.
Coordination.

To the extent feasible, this system shall be carried out in coordination with the National Estuarine Reserve Research System established by 16 U.S.C. § 1461.

To the extent feasible, lands and waters within this system shall be dedicated as components of the “State Nature and Historic Preserve” as provided in Article XIV, Section 5, of the Constitution and as nature reserves pursuant to G.S. 143B-135.250 to G.S. 143B-135.270.

History.

1989, c. 344, s. 1; c. 770, s. 47; 2019-241, s. 4.

§§ 113A-130 through 113A-134.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 6. Public Beach and Coastal Waterfront Access Program.

§ 113A-134.1.
Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that there are many privately owned lots or tracts of land in close proximity to the Atlantic Ocean and the coastal waters in North Carolina that have been and will be adversely affected by hazards such as erosion, flooding, and storm damage. The sand dunes on many of these lots provide valuable protective functions for public and private property and serve as an integral part of the beach sand supply system. Placement of permanent substantial structures on these lots will lead to increased risks of loss of life and property, increased public costs, and potential eventual encroachment of structures onto the beach.

The public has traditionally fully enjoyed the State’s beaches and coastal waters and public access to and use of the beaches and coastal waters. The beaches provide a recreational resource of great importance to North Carolina and its citizens and this makes a significant contribution to the economic well-being of the State. The General Assembly finds that the beaches and coastal waters are resources of statewide significance and have been customarily freely used and enjoyed by people throughout the State. Public access to beaches and coastal waters in North Carolina is, however, becoming severely limited in some areas. Also, the lack of public parking is increasingly making the use of existing public access difficult or impractical in some areas. The public interest would best be served by providing increased access to beaches and coastal waters and by making available additional public parking facilities. There is therefore, a pressing need in North Carolina to establish a comprehensive program for the identification, acquisition, improvement, and maintenance of public accessways to the beaches and coastal waters.

History.

1981, c. 925, s. 1; 1983, c. 751, s. 13; 1989, c. 344; s. 2; 1995, c. 183, s. 2.

§ 113A-134.2.
Creation of program; administration; purpose; definitions.

There is created the Public Beach and Coastal Waterfront Access Program, to be administered by the Commission and the Department, for the purpose of acquiring, improving, and maintaining property along the Atlantic Ocean and coastal waterways to which the public has rights-of-access or public trust rights as provided in this Part.

As used in this Part:

“Public trust resources” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 113-131(e)

.

“Public trust rights” has the same meaning as in

G.S. 1-45.1

.

History.

1981, c. 925, s. 1; 1983, c. 757, s. 13; 1989, c. 344, s. 2; c. 727, s. 136; c. 751, s. 13; 1995, c. 183, s. 3.

§ 113A-134.3.
Standards for public access program.

The Commission, with the support of the Department, shall establish and carry out a program to assure the acquisition, improvement, and maintenance of a system of public access to coastal beaches and public trust waters. This public access program shall include standards to be adopted by the Commission for the acquisition of property and the use and maintenance of the property. The standards shall be written to assure that land acquisition funds shall only be used to purchase interests in property that will be of benefit to the general public. Priority shall be given to acquisition of lands that due to adverse effects of natural hazards, such as past and potential erosion, flooding, and storm damage, are unsuitable for the placement of permanent structures, including lands for which a permit for improvements has been denied under rules adopted pursuant to State law. The program shall be designed to provide and maintain reasonable public access and necessary parking, within the limitations of the resources available, to all coastal beaches and public trust waters where access is compatible with the natural resources involved and where reasonable access is not available.

To the maximum extent possible, this program shall be coordinated with State and local beach and coastal water management and recreational programs and shall be carried out in cooperation with local governments. Prior to the purchase of any interests in property, the Secretary or his designee shall make a written finding of the public purpose to be served by the acquisition. Once property is purchased, the Department may allow property, without charge, to be controlled and operated by the county or municipality in which the property is located, subject to an agreement requiring that the local government use and maintain the property for its intended public purpose.

Subject to any restrictions imposed by law, any funds appropriated or otherwise made available to the Public Beach and Coastal Waterfront Access Program (Program) may be used to meet matching requirements for federal or other funds. The Department shall make every effort to obtain funds from sources other than the General Fund to implement this program. Funds may be used to acquire or develop land for pedestrian access including parking and to make grants to local governments to accomplish the purposes of this Part. All acquisitions or dispositions of property made pursuant to this Part shall be in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 146 of the General Statutes. All grants to local governments pursuant to this Part for land acquisitions shall be made on the following conditions:

The local government agrees to dedicate acquired lands in perpetuity for public access and for the benefit of the general public. The dedication shall be recorded in the office of the register of deeds in the county where the dedicated lands are located.

If Program grant funds are used to acquire a lease or easement, the lease or easement agreement shall have a minimum term of 25 years.

If the local government uses the property for a purpose other than beach or coastal waters access or elects to sell or otherwise dispose of the property, the local government shall reimburse the State an amount that is the greater of (i) the amount of Program grant funds provided to purchase the property or (ii) an amount equal to the same proportion of the current market value of the property as the proportion of the original purchase price of the property funded with Program grant funds.

History.

1981, c. 925, s. 1; 1983, c. 334; c. 757, s. 13; 1987, c. 827, s. 145; 1989, c. 344, s. 2; c. 727, s. 137; c. 751, s. 13; 1995, c. 183, s. 4; 2021-158, s. 1.

§§ 113A-134.4 through 113A-134.9.

Reserved for future codification purposes.